Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7112
Confidentiality of information.

Any information acquired during a stress management session shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the extent necessary to provide assistance pursuant to the stress management session. Information otherwise available from the original source shall not be immune from discovery or use in any civil or criminal action merely because the information was presented during a stress management session if the testimony sought is otherwise permissible and discoverable.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 108;

Laws 1997, LB 184, § 12.